District of Columbia statutes.
47-102

Total indebtedness not to be increased.

There shall be no increase of the amount of the total indebtedness of the District of Columbia existing on June 11, 1878; and any officer or person who shall knowingly increase, or aid or abet in increasing, such total indebtedness, shall be deemed guilty of a high misdemeanor, and, on conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment not exceeding 10 years, and by fine not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01].

June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 108, ch. 180, § 13
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(a), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 47-102.
1973 Ed., § 47-102.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not exceeding $10,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.